Washington statutes.
RCW 10.64.027

Conditions of release.

In order to minimize the trauma to the victim, the court may attach conditions on release of a defendant under RCW 10.64.025 regarding the whereabouts of the defendant, contact with the victim, or other conditions.

[ 1989 c 276 s 5.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 276: See note following RCW 9.95.062.